Vermont, session 2025-2026, H239.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 331 is amended to read:
§ 331. TEMPORARY EMPLOYEES
* * *
(f)(1) An individual employed in a temporary or seasonal capacity shall
VT LEG #380681 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.239
2025 Page 2 of 5
(A) be entitled to the whistleblower protections, rights, and remedies
provided to State employees pursuant to sections 971-978 of this title;
(B) be paid in accordance with the job classification and pay plan for
classified State employees that is most closely applicable to the work
performed by the individual; and
(C) receive paid and unpaid leave, including sick and annual leave,
parental and family leave, holidays, and other leave benefits provided to
comparable classified State employees.
(2) An individual employed in a temporary or seasonal capacity shall
not be terminated without good cause.
(3) The State shall provide an individual who has been employed in a
temporary capacity for a period of six months with health insurance benefits
that, at a minimum, satisfy the affordable minimum essential coverage
standards of the Affordable Care Act and provide coverage for the individual’s
dependents.
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(5) “State employee” means any individual employed on a permanent or
limited-status basis by the State of Vermont, the Vermont State Colleges, the
VT LEG #380681 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.239
2025 Page 3 of 5
University of Vermont, the State’s Attorneys’ offices, or as a full-time deputy
sheriff paid by the State pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 290(b), including permanent
part-time employees, and an individual whose work has ceased as a
consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute or because of
any unfair labor practice, but excluding an individual:
(A) exempt or excluded from the State classified service under the
provisions of section 311 of this title, except that the following types of
employees are included within the meaning of “State employee”:
(i) State Police in the Department of Public Safety;
(ii) employees of the Defender General, excluding attorneys
employed directly by the Defender General and attorneys contracted to provide
legal services;
(iii) deputy State’s Attorneys;
(iv) employees of State’s Attorneys’ offices; and
(v) full-time deputy sheriffs paid by the State pursuant to 24
V.S.A. § 290(b) are included within the meaning of “State employee”; and
(vi) individuals employed in temporary or intermittent positions
who work more than 1,280 hours per year in one or more such positions for a
period of two years, or who are designated as temporary employees but whose
employment does not comply with the requirements of subsection 331(b) of
this title;
VT LEG #380681 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.239
2025 Page 4 of 5
* * *
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 1011 is amended to read:
§ 1011. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(8) “Employee,” means any individual employed and compensated on a
permanent or limited status basis by the Judiciary Department, including
permanent part-time employees and any individual whose employment has
ceased as a consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute or
because of an unfair labor practice. “Employee” does not include any of the
following:
* * *
(E) an individual employed on a temporary, contractual, seasonal, or
on-call basis, including an intern, provided that:
(i) the individual was hired to:
(I) temporarily replace an employee on vacation, medical leave,
or another leave of absence;
(II) accommodate peak or increased workloads; or
(III) replace or supplement permanent employees working on
special assignments or projects not normally included in the duties of
permanent employees; and
VT LEG #380681 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.239
2025 Page 5 of 5
(ii) the individual has not worked more than 1,280 hours per year
in one or more such positions for a period of two years;
* * *
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380681 v.1